apertium-bel.bel.dix
    <pardef n="в/ока__n_nt_nn">
      <e><p><l>ока</l><r>ока<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ока</l><r>ока<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ока</l><r>ока<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оку</l><r>ока<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>окам</l><r>ока<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оках</l><r>ока<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>очы</l><r>ока<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>очы</l><r>ока<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ачэй</l><r>ока<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ачам</l><r>ока<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ачамі</l><r>ока<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ачах</l><r>ока<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="чалавек">
        <e><p><l>людзей</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>людзям</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>людзей</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>людзьмі</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>людзі</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>людзях</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>чалавек</l><r><s n="n"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nmsg1"/></e>
        <e><p><l>чалавека</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="чалавек__n_m_aa">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/></r></p><par n="чалавек"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->

    <pardef n="Беларус/ь__np"> <!-- FIXME: Check -->
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r>ь<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>ь<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>ь<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r>ь<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>сю</l><r>ь<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>ь<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Расі/я__np">
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>я<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r>я<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яй</l><r>я<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__Янк/а"> <!-- TODO: check -->
      <e><p><l>а</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ою</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Янк/а__np_ant_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r>а<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/></r></p><par n="BASE__Янк/а"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__Маш/а"> <!-- TODO: check -->
      <e><p><l>а</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ею</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Маш/а__np_ant_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r>а<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/></r></p><par n="BASE__Маш/а"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="друг/і__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>і<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/></r></p><par n="BASE__хутк/і"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>і<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/></r></p><par n="BASE__малад/ога"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="малад/ы__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__малад/ы"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__малад/ога"/></e>
      <e><p><l>зей</l><r>ы<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зейшы</l><r>ы<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="беларуск/і__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>і<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__хутк/і"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>і<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__хутк/ага"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="хут/кі__adj">
      <e><p><l>к</l><r>кі<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__хутк/і"/></e>
      <e><p><l>к</l><r>кі<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__хутк/ага"/></e>
      <e><p><l>чэй</l><r>кі<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>чэйшы</l><r>кі<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="чырвон/ы__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__малад/ы"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__хутк/ага"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="добр/ы__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p><par n="BASE__малад/ы"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p><par n="BASE__хутк/ага"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="вялік/і__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>і<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p><par n="BASE__хутк/і"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>і<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p><par n="BASE__хутк/ага"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="шчаслів/ы__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p><par n="BASE__шчаслів/ы"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p><par n="BASE__шчаслів/ага"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="стар/ы__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p><par n="BASE__шчаслів/ы"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p><par n="BASE__малад/ога"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->

    <pardef n="BASE__чака/ю">
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еш</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__скаж/у">
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>аш</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__чака/й">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>це</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__бы/ў">
      <e><p><l>ў</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ла</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ло</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лі</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__знік">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ла</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ло</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лі</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__знайш/оў">
      <e><p><l>оў</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ла</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ло</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лі</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="вока"><i>в</i><par n="в/ока__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="чалавек"><p><l></l><r>чалавек</r></p><par n="чалавек__n_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="Беларусь"><i>Беларус</i><par n="Беларус/ь__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Расія"><i>Расі</i><par n="Расі/я__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Маша"><i>Маш</i><par n="Маш/а__np_ant_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Янка"><i>Янк</i><par n="Янк/а__np_ant_m"/></e>
    <e lm="другі"><i>друг</i><par n="друг/і__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="малады"><i>малад</i><par n="малад/ы__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="халодны"><i>халод</i><par n="малад/ы__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="чырвоны"><i>чырвон</i><par n="чырвон/ы__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="хуткі"><i>хут</i><par n="хут/кі__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="беларускі"><i>беларуск</i><par n="беларуск/і__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="усебеларускі"><i>усебеларуск</i><par n="беларуск/і__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="добры"><i>добр</i><par n="добр/ы__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="вялікі"><i>вялік</i><par n="вялік/і__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="маленькі"><i>маленьк</i><par n="вялік/і__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="шчаслівы"><i>шчаслів</i><par n="шчаслів/ы__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="стары"><i>стар</i><par n="стар/ы__adj"/></e>
